Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.142

Retirement board abolished—Transfer of powers, duties, and functions.

The retirement board established by this chapter is abolished. All powers, duties, and functions of the board are transferred to the director of retirement systems.

[ 1982 c 163 s 18.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—1982 c 163: See notes following RCW 2.10.052.